Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-112
Drainage improvements; compensation and damages for land taken or affected; application; when made.

At any time before the day set for hearing, after persons are notified as provided in section 31-110, any person or corporation whose lands are taken or affected in any way by the improvement may make application to the commissioners in writing for compensation and damages, and a failure to make such application shall be held a waiver of all rights thereto.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 12, p. 240;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 12, p. 457;

R.S.1913, § 1729;

C.S.1922, § 1676;

C.S.1929, § 31-112;

R.S.1943, § 31-112.

Persons whose land will be damaged by construction of ditch must be compensated. Costello v. Colfax County, 112 Neb. 40, 198 N.W. 357 (1924).

Filing of claim waives irregularities in proceedings. Gutschow v. Washington County, 74 Neb. 794, 105 N.W. 548 (1905).